Nebraska, session 109, LB21.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Sections 1 to 9 of this act shall be known and may be cited as
the Uniform Unlawful Restrictions in Land Records Act.
Sec. 2. In the Uniform Unlawful Restrictions in Land Records Act:
(1) Amendment means a document that removes an unlawful restriction.
(2) Document means a record recorded or eligible to be recorded in land
records.
(3) Governing instrument means a document recorded in land records that:
(A) establishes a governing body responsible for management of common
areas or facilities used by more than one owner of a property interest affected
by the document; and
(B) requires contribution, enforceable by a lien on a separate property
interest, of a share of taxes, insurance premiums, maintenance, or improvement
of, or services or other expenses for the common benefit of, the real property
described in the document.
(4) Index means a system that enables a search for a document in land
records.
(5) Land records means documents and indexes maintained by a recorder.
(6) Owner means a person that has a fee interest in real property.
(7) Person means an individual, estate, business or nonprofit entity,
government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or other
legal entity.
(8) Record, used as a noun, means information:
(A) inscribed on a tangible medium; or
(B) stored in an electronic or other medium and retrievable in perceivable
form.
(9) Recorder means an officer authorized under other law of this state to
accept a document for recordation in land records.
(10) Remove means eliminate any apparent or purportedly continuing effect
on title to real property.
(11) Unlawful restriction means a prohibition, restriction, covenant, or
condition in a document that purports to interfere with or restrict the
transfer, use, or occupancy of real property:
(A) on the basis of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, familial
status, disability, or other personal characteristics; and
(B) in violation of other law of this state or federal law.
Sec. 3. Except with respect to property to which section 4 of this act
applies, an owner of real property subject to an unlawful restriction may
submit to the recorder for recordation in the land records an amendment to
remove the unlawful restriction, but only as to the owner's property.
Sec. 4. (a) The governing body of an association of owners identified in
a governing instrument may, without a vote of the members of the association,
amend the governing instrument to remove an unlawful restriction.
(b) A member of an association of owners may request, in a record that
sufficiently identifies an unlawful restriction in the governing instrument,
that the governing body exercise its authority under subsection (a) of this
section. Not later than ninety days after the governing body receives the
request, the governing body shall determine reasonably and in good faith
whether the governing instrument includes the unlawful restriction. If the
governing body determines the governing instrument includes the unlawful
restriction, the governing body not later than ninety days after the
determination shall amend the governing instrument to remove the unlawful
restriction.
(c) Notwithstanding any provision of the governing instrument or other law
of this state, the governing body may execute an amendment under this section.
(d) An amendment under this section is effective notwithstanding any
provision of the governing instrument or other law of this state that requires
a vote of the members of the association of owners to amend the governing
instrument.
Sec. 5. (a) An amendment under the Uniform Unlawful Restrictions in Land
Records Act must identify the owner, the real property affected, and the
document containing the unlawful restriction. The amendment must include a
conspicuous statement in substantially the following form:
"This amendment removes from this deed or other document affecting title
to real property an unlawful restriction as defined under the Uniform Unlawful
Restrictions in Land Records Act. This amendment does not affect the validity
or enforceability of a restriction that is not an unlawful restriction."
(b) The amendment must be executed and acknowledged in the manner required
for recordation of a document in the land records. The amendment must be
recorded in the land records of each county in which the document containing
-1-

LB21 LB21
2025 2025
the unlawful restriction is recorded.
(c) The amendment does not affect the validity or enforceability of any
restriction that is not an unlawful restriction.
(d) The amendment or a future conveyance of the affected real property is
not a republication of a restriction that otherwise would expire by passage of
time under other law of this state.
Sec. 6. The following form may be used by an owner to make an amendment
under section 3 of this act:
Amendment by Owner to Remove an Unlawful Restriction
This amendment is recorded under the Uniform Unlawful Restrictions in Land
Records Act (the act), by an owner of an interest in real property subject to
an unlawful restriction as defined under the act.
(1) Name of owner: ..............................
(2) Owner's property that is subject to the unlawful restriction is
described as follows:
Address: ..............................
Legal Description: ..............................
(3) This amendment amends the following document:
Title of document being amended: ..............................
Recording date of document being amended: .....................
Recording information (book/page or instrument number): ............
This amendment removes from the document described in paragraph (3) all
unlawful restrictions as defined under the act. Removal of an unlawful
restriction through this amendment does not affect the validity and
enforceability of any other restriction that is not an unlawful restriction as
defined under the act, at the time of filing this amendment. This amendment is
not effective if the property is subject to a governing instrument as defined
under the act.
.............................. ..........
Owner's Signature Date
This document was acknowledged before me this ............. day
of ........., 20...., by .............................. (name of person
acknowledged).
.............................. (Seal)
Notary Public
Sec. 7. (a) The recorder shall record an amendment submitted under the
Uniform Unlawful Restrictions in Land Records Act, add the amendment to the
index, and cross reference the amendment to the document containing the
unlawful restriction.
(b) The recorder and the recorder's jurisdiction are not liable for
recording an amendment under the Uniform Unlawful Restrictions in Land Records
Act.
Sec. 8. In applying and construing the Uniform Unlawful Restrictions in
Land Records Act, a court shall consider the promotion of uniformity of the law
among jurisdictions that enact it.
Sec. 9. The Uniform Unlawful Restrictions in Land Records Act modifies,
limits, or supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce
Act, 15 U.S.C. 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede 15 U.S.C.
7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in 15
U.S.C. 7003(b).
-2-